Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Application for Permit for Appropriation; Procedure
§ 41-4-514.
Petition for amendment of permits; petition for amended certificate of appropriation; hearings on petition; notice; costs.

The state engineer may correct clerical errors and, upon written petition of the permit holder, amend any permit to appropriate water at any time prior to adjudication by the state board of control when in the judgment of the state engineer the amendment appears necessary, and providing:

No petition to amend shall be granted if existing water appropriators who have adjudicated water rights or valid permits are injuriously affected;

The priority date of the permit shall not be improved;

The total amount of the appropriation of water shall not exceed the amount set forth in the original permit and, for irrigation permits, the total area of land shall not exceed the total area described in the original permit;

The changes shall be limited to those within the area and concept of the original application for permit or development plan;

No change of use shall be granted; and

A reasonable filing fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) shall accompany each petition filed with the state engineer.

The state engineer may hold a public hearing on a petition under subsection (a) of this section to gather facts to determine if other appropriators will be injuriously affected. The state engineer shall hold a public hearing on a petition under subsection (a) of this section if requested to do so by any affected appropriator. If the state engineer holds a public hearing, the state engineer shall cause to be published no less than fifteen (15) days before the hearing a notice of the hearing to be advertised in at least one (1) issue of any newspaper having general circulation in the community where the water right or valid permit involved is situated. The petitioner shall pay the cost of the advertisement prior to the time of hearing, and provide a record of proceedings to be transmitted to the state engineer. Following receipt of the record, the state engineer shall promptly review the record and issue a written order granting or denying the permit amendment.

Any decision by the state engineer granting or denying a permit amendment under this section may be appealed to the board of control which shall conduct a contested case hearing in accordance with its rules and regulations and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The state board of control is authorized, upon the written petition of the owner, to issue amended certificates of appropriation for water rights that have been adjudicated for the purpose of correcting clerical errors and when in the judgment of the board it appears necessary. The total amount of the appropriation of water shall not exceed the amount set forth in the original certificate of appropriation and, in the case of an appropriation for irrigation use, the total area of the lands shall not exceed the total area described in the original certificate of appropriation. The amended area shall not exceed the area actually irrigated under the original right. Any petitioner shall be the owner of all the land involved in the petition, except that in cases where amendments are petitioned for in a regularly organized conservancy or irrigation district, the consent of the district board and the consent or agreement of the land owners directly involved is sufficient. Proper adjustments shall be made in any assessment levied against lands affected by the amendment. The rights of other appropriators shall not be injuriously affected thereby.

Upon petition for an amended certificate of appropriation of water, the state board of control may cause a public hearing to be held on the petition before the superintendent of the water division in which such appropriation is located, with notice of the hearing to be advertised in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the community where the water right involved is situated. The state board of control shall hold a public hearing if requested to do so by any affected appropriator. The petitioner shall pay the cost of the publication prior to the time of hearing and provide a record of proceedings to be transmitted by the division superintendent to the state board of control, together with his report. At the time the petition is filed a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each amended certificate issued shall be collected by the state board of control with a deposit of sufficient funds to cover the cost of preparing and recording a certified copy of the order. The fees for recording shall be returned to the petitioner in case the petition is not granted.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 123, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 846; Laws 1929, ch. 102, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-415; Laws 1945, ch. 118, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-253; Laws 1957, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-213; Laws 1961, ch. 214, § 1; 1977, ch. 98, § 1; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1985, ch. 108, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

added “and” in (a)(v); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act immediately effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

In general. —

This section provides, in broad language, for correction of errors, provided that correction be made before final adjudication, and it includes errors in description of land. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

This section is self-limiting and narrow in its application.

John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Broad discretion granted. —

This section grants both the state engineer and the state board of control broad discretion upon its face to amend a petition, where it allows either to amend a petition when it “appears desirable or necessary”; and in both cases submitting it to their respective judgments. John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

State engineer's error-correcting discretion under subsection (a) must be limited

to the correction of such errors as are contained in the original permit, as those errors are established by proof that the permit was not originally, or by any valid extension, issued in conformity with the intent of the applicant and/or the state engineer. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

“Adjudication” of a water right

is simply a determination by the board of control that water has been and is being beneficially applied to the land to the extent and by the means set out in the permit. Snake River Land Co. v. State Bd. of Control, 560 P.2d 733,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1977).

Only water which has been beneficially applied is subject to sale and transfer.

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Attachment to land. —

A water right, by direct flow from a stream, shall be attached to land to be irrigated, which must be designated from initiation of the right until it is perfected. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

In absence of permitted corrections, an adjudicated water right becomes attached to lands as described in the application and permit. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

For comment, “Changing Manner and Place of Use of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1975).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-4-515.
Endorsement of correction on records.

When any permit is corrected by the state engineer, as authorized by this act [§§

41-4-514

through

41-4-516

], the corrections shall be endorsed on the records and shall not affect the priority of the permit.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 123, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 847; Laws 1929, ch. 102, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-416; C.S. 1945, § 71-254; W.S. 1957, § 41-214.

§ 41-4-516.
Rules and regulations authorized for W.S. 41-4-514 through 41-4-516.

The state engineer is hereby authorized to provide rules and regulations regarding the form of application and procedure to be followed by the applicant in proceeding under this act [§§

41-4-514

through

41-4-516

].

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 123, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 848; R.S. 1931, § 122-417; C.S. 1945, § 71-255; W.S. 1957, § 41-215.

§ 41-4-517.
Appeal from action of state engineer or order of board of control.

Any applicant who is aggrieved by the endorsement made by the state engineer upon his application, may, in writing, in an informal manner and without pleadings of any character, appeal to the board of control within sixty (60) days of the date of receipt of notice of the endorsement, for an examination and reversal of any such action of the state engineer. Upon receipt of such an appeal, the secretary of the board of control shall notify the members of the board of control and upon receipt of replies from them shall fix a date, as early as may be possible, when such appeal shall be heard before the board. All parties and those who claim an adverse interest thereto, shall be notified and shall be given an opportunity to be heard. Any person aggrieved by any order or determination of the board of control in cases embracing such appeals from the state engineer, may appeal to the district court of the county in which the greatest use of water is proposed to be made under the application. The procedure in the appeal from a decision of the board of control shall be in conformity with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. The attorney general shall, in such cases, represent the state board of control.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 923; Laws 1909, ch. 64, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 733; C.S. 1920, § 841; R.S. 1931, § 122-410; C.S. 1945, § 71-244; W.S. 1957, § 41-216; Laws 1985, ch. 191, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Water use deemed expertise of state engineer and board of control. —

The determination of the state engineer and the board of control of what use will best utilize water and insure its beneficial use must be respected by the supreme court, because the board and state engineer are better equipped to dispose of such matters. John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were originally adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Quoted

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Hunt v. City of Laramie, 26 Wyo. 160, 181 P. 137,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1919); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).